Utah statutes.
26-15a-106.   Certified food safety manager.

(1)  Before a person may manage a food service establishment as a certified food safety manager, that person shall submit documentation in the format prescribed by the department to the appropriate local health department indicating a passing score on a department-approved examination.

(2)  To continue to manage a food service establishment, a certified food safety manager shall:

(a)  successfully complete, every three years, renewal requirements established by department rule which are consistent with original certification requirements; and

(b)  submit documentation in the format prescribed by the department within 30 days of the completion of renewal requirements to the appropriate local health department.

(3)  A local health department may deny, revoke, or suspend the authority of a certified food safety manager to manage a food service establishment or require the completion of additional food safety training courses for any one of the following reasons:

(a)  submitting information required under Subsection (1) or (2) that is false, incomplete, or misleading;

(b)  repeated violations of department or local health department food safety rules; or

(c)  operating a food service establishment in a way that causes or creates a health hazard or otherwise threatens the public health, safety, or welfare.

(4)  A determination of a local health department made pursuant to Subsection (3) may be appealed by a certified food safety manager in the same manner provided for in Subsection 26-15a-104(4).

(5)  No person may use the title "certified food safety manager," or any other similar title, unless the person has satisfied the requirements of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 86, 2000 General Session

